tests/N-acc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../bua.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../bua.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "nouns ending in {н}":
    наһан<n><acc> :     наһыe 
    хурдан<n><acc> :     хурдые 
    хэмжээн<n><acc> :     хэмжээе 

  "regular nouns":
    аха<n><acc> : ахые
    һургуули<n><acc> : һургуулиие
    ном<n><acc> : номые
    нохой<n><acc> : нохойе
    жороо<n><acc> : жороое
    морин<n><acc> : мориие
    һанаан<n><acc> : һанаае

  "noun with {ң}":
    ан<n><acc> : ангые
